Utah statutes.
9-4-913.   Power to borrow money and make loans -- Issuance of notes and
bonds.
(1)  The corporation has the power and is authorized to borrow money and to
issue from time to time its notes, bonds, and other obligations in such
principal amounts as the corporation determines is necessary to provide
sufficient funds for:
(a)  the purchase of mortgage loans from mortgage lenders;
(b)  the making of construction loans;
(c)  the making of loans to housing authorities;
(d)  the payment of interest on bonds, notes, and other obligations of the
corporation;
(e)  the establishment of reserves to secure the bonds, notes, and other
obligations;
(f)  the making of mortgage loans;
(g)  the making of loans to mortgage lenders or other lending institutions
with respect to multifamily residential rental housing under terms and
conditions requiring the proceeds of these loans to be used by these mortgage
lenders or other lending institutions for the making of loans for new
multifamily residential rental housing or the acquisition or rehabilitation of
existing multifamily residential rental housing;
(h)  the making of loans for the rehabilitation of residential housing; and
(i)  all other expenditures of the corporation incident to and necessary or
convenient to carry out its purposes and powers.
(2) (a)  The corporation shall have the power to issue notes to renew notes
and bonds to pay notes, including the interest thereon, and whenever it
considers refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of new
bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and to issue
bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any of its
corporate purposes.
(b)  The refunding bonds may be:
(i)  sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption, or payment of
the bonds to be refunded; or
(ii)  exchanged for the bonds to be refunded.
(3) (a)  Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the corporation,
every issue of its notes or bonds shall be general obligations of the
corporation payable solely out of any revenues or money of the corporation,
subject only to any agreements with the holders of particular notes or bonds
pledging any particular money or revenues.
(b)  These bonds or notes may be additionally secured by a pledge of any grant
or contribution from the federal government or any corporation, association,
institution, or person or a pledge of any money, income, or revenues of the
corporation from any source.
(4) (a)  The notes and bonds shall be authorized by resolution or resolutions
of the corporation, shall bear the date or dates, and shall mature at the time
or times as the resolution or resolutions may provide, except that no note,
including any renewals thereof, shall mature more than five years from the
date of its original issue, and no bond shall mature more than 50 years from
the date of its issue, as the resolution may provide.
(b)  The notes and bonds shall bear interest at the rate or rates, including
variations in the rates, be in denominations, be in a form, either coupon or
registered, carry the registration privileges, be executed in the manner, be
payable in a medium of payment, at the place or places, and be subject to the
terms of redemption, including redemption prior to maturity, as the resolution
or resolutions may provide.
(c)  The notes and bonds of the corporation may be sold by the corporation at
public or private sale, and at the price or prices as the corporation shall
determine.
(d) (i)  The notes and bonds may bear interest at a variable interest rate as
the resolution may provide.
(ii)  The resolution may establish a method, formula, or index pursuant to
which the interest rate on the notes and bonds may be determined from time to
time.
(e)  In connection with the notes and bonds the corporation may authorize and
enter into agreements or other arrangements with financial, banking, and other
institutions for letters of credit, standby letters of credit, surety bonds,
reimbursement agreements, remarketing agreements, indexing agreements, tender
agent agreements, and other agreements with respect to securing the notes and
bonds, with respect to enhancing the marketability and credit worthiness of
the notes and bonds, with respect to determining a variable interest rate on
the notes and bonds, and with respect to the payment from any legally
available source (which may include the proceeds of the notes and bonds) of
fees, charges, and other amounts coming due with respect to any such
agreements.
(5)  Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any notes or bonds or their
issue may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract or
contracts with their holders, as to:
(a)  pledging all or any part of the revenues to secure the payment of the
notes or bonds or of any issue thereof, subject to the agreements with
noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;
(b)  pledging all or any part of the assets of the corporation, including
mortgages and obligations securing the same, to secure the payment of the
notes or bonds or of any issue of notes or bonds, subject to the agreements
with noteholders or bondholders as may then exist;
(c)  the use and disposition of the gross income from mortgages owned by the
corporation and payment of principal of mortgages owned by the corporation;
(d)  the setting aside of reserves or sinking funds and their regulation and
disposition;
(e)  limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of sale of notes or
bonds may be applied and pledging the proceeds to secure the payment of the
notes or bonds or of their issue;
(f)  limitations on the issuance of additional notes or bonds, including:
(i)  the terms upon which additional notes or bonds may be issued and secured;
and
(ii)  the refunding of outstanding or other notes or bonds;
(g)  the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with
noteholders or bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of notes or
bonds to which the holders must consent, and the manner in which the consent
may be given;
(h)  limitations on the amount of money to be expended by the corporation for
operating expenses of the corporation;
(i)  vesting in a trustee or trustees the property, rights, powers, and duties
in trust as the corporation may determine, which may include any or all of the
rights, powers, and duties of the trustee appointed by the noteholders or
bondholders pursuant to this act and limiting or abrogating the right of
noteholders or bondholders to appoint a trustee under this act or limiting the
rights, powers, and duties of the trustee;
(j)  defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in
the obligations and duties of the corporation to the holders of the notes or
bonds and providing for the rights and remedies of the holders of the notes or
bonds in the event of default, including as a matter of right the appointment
of a receiver; but the rights and remedies may not be inconsistent with the
general laws of the state and other provisions of this part; or
(k)  any other matters, of like or different character, which in any way
affect the security or protection of the holders of the notes or bonds.
(6) (a)  Any pledge made by the corporation shall be valid, enforceable, and
binding from the time when the pledge is made and shall have a lien priority
based on the time of grant or, if more than one lien is granted at a given
time, as set forth in the resolution or instrument pursuant to which the
pledge is made.
(b)  The revenues, money, or property so pledged and thereafter received by
the corporation shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge and
shall constitute a perfected lien without any physical delivery thereof or
further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as
against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise
against the corporation, irrespective of whether the parties have notice
thereof.
(c)  Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is
created need be recorded.
(7)  The corporation, subject to the agreements with noteholders or
bondholders as may then exist, shall have power out of any funds available for
it to purchase notes or bonds of the corporation, which shall immediately be
cancelled, at a price not exceeding:
(a)  if the notes or bonds are then redeemable, the redemption price then
applicable plus accrued interest to the next interest payment thereon; or
(b)  if the notes or bonds are not then redeemable, the redemption price
applicable on the first date after the purchase upon which the notes or bonds
become subject to redemption plus accrued interest to the date.
(8) (a)  The notes and bonds shall be secured by a trust indenture by and
between the corporation and a corporate trustee, which may be any bank having
the power of a trust company or any trust company within or without the state.
(b)  The trust indenture may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing
the rights and remedies of the noteholders or bondholders as may be reasonable
and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the
duties of the corporation in relation to the exercise of its corporate powers
and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all money.
(c)  The corporation may provide by the trust indenture for the payment of the
proceeds of the notes or bonds and the revenues to the trustee under the trust
indenture or other depository, and for the method of their disbursement, with
any safeguards and restrictions as it may determine.
(d)  All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated
as a part of the operating expenses of the corporation.
(e)  If the notes or bonds shall be secured by a trust indenture, the
noteholders or bondholders may not have authority to appoint a separate
trustee to represent them.
(9)  Whether or not the notes and bonds are of the form and character as to be
negotiable instruments under the terms of the Uniform Commercial Code, the
notes and bonds are negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for all
the purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code, subject only to the provisions of
the notes and bonds relating to registration.
(10)  In the event that any of the trustees or officers of the corporation
shall cease to be trustees or officers of the corporation prior to the
delivery of any notes or bonds or coupons signed by them, their signatures or
facsimiles of their signatures shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for
all purposes, the same as if the trustees or officers had remained in office
until the delivery.
(11)  Neither the trustees of the corporation nor any other person executing
the notes or bonds issued under this chapter are subject to personal liability
or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.
(12)  The corporation shall have the power to provide for the replacement of
lost, destroyed, or mutilated bonds or notes.
